Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 2. Child Welfare Agencies.

§§ 63.2-1809 through 63.2-1813.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to facilities and programs, see
§§ 22.1-289.049 — 22.1-289.054.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-1809

, regulated child day programs to require proof of child identity and age; report to law-enforcement agencies, derived from
1998, c. 860,
§ 63.1-196.002;
2002, c. 747;
2004, c. 450.

Former § 63.2-1809.1, insurance notice requirements for family day homes; civil penalty, derived from
2006, c. 923;
2007, c. 594.

Former § 63.2-1810, pertaining to dual licenses for certain child day centers, derived from 1981, c. 287,
§ 63.1-196.01;
1987, c. 698;
1993, cc. 730,
742;
2002, c. 747;
2012, cc. 803,
835.

Former § 63.2-1811, pertaining to asbestos inspection required for child day centers, derived from 1987, c. 654,
§ 63.1-198.01;
1988, c. 723;
1993, cc. 660,
730,
742;
2002, c. 747.

Former § 63.2-1812, pertaining to delay in acting on application, or in notification, derived from Code 1950,
§ 63-237;
1968, cc. 578, 585,
§ 63.1-200;
1999, c. 740;
2002, c. 747.

Former § 63.2-1813, pertaining to visitation by parents or guardians in child day programs, derived from 1985, c. 251,
§ 63.1-210.1;
1993, cc. 730,
742;
2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1814.
Public funds to be withheld for serious or persistent violations.

The Board and the State Board of Education may adopt policies, as permitted by state and federal law, to restrict the eligibility of a licensed child welfare agency to receive or continue to receive funds when such agency is found to be in serious or persistent violation of regulations.

History.

1993, cc. 730, 742, § 63.1-211.2; 1996, c. 492; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1815.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-1815

, pertaining to applicability of subtitle to certain schools and institutions, derived from Code 1950,
§ 63-255;
1968, c. 578,
§ 63.1-218;
2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1816.
Municipal and county appropriations; contracts.

The governing bodies of the several cities and counties of this Commonwealth may, in their discretion, appropriate to incorporated charitable organizations licensed by the Commissioner for the purpose of receiving and caring for children, or placing or boarding them in private homes, such sums as to them may seem proper, for the maintenance and care of such dependent children as the charitable organizations may receive from the respective cities and counties. The governing body of any county may make contracts with such organizations.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-256; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-219; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).

§ 63.2-1817.
Acceptance and control over children by licensed child-placing agency, children’s residential facility or independent foster home.

A licensed child-placing agency, children’s residential facility or independent foster home shall have the right to accept, for any purpose not contrary to the limitations contained in its license, such children as may be entrusted or committed to it by the parents, guardians, relatives or other persons having legal custody thereof, or committed by any court of competent jurisdiction. The agency, facility or home shall, within the terms of its license and the agreement or order by which such child is entrusted or committed to its care, have custody and control of every child so entrusted or committed and accepted, until he is lawfully discharged, has been adopted, or has attained his majority. An entrustment agreement for the termination of parental rights and responsibilities with respect to such child shall be executed in writing and notarized.

An agency that is licensed as a child-placing agency by the Department and certified as a proprietary school for students with disabilities by the Department of Education shall not be required to take custody of any child placed in its special education program but shall enter into a placement agreement with the parents or guardian of the child concerning the respective responsibilities of the agency and the parents or guardian for the care and control of the child. Such an agency shall conform with all other legal requirements of licensed child-placing agencies including the provisions of §§ 16.1-281 and 16.1-282.

A licensed private child-placing agency may accept placement of a child through an agreement with a local department where the local department retains legal custody of the child or where the parents or legal guardian of the child retain legal custody but have entered into a placement agreement with the local department or the public agency designated by the community policy and management team.

Whenever a licensed child-placing agency accepts legal custody of a child, the agency shall comply with §§ 16.1-281 and 16.1-282.

A children’s residential facility licensed as a temporary emergency shelter may accept a child for placement provided that verbal agreement for placement is obtained from the parents, guardians, relatives or other persons having legal custody thereof, within eight hours of the child’s arrival at the facility and provided that a written placement agreement is completed and signed by the legal guardian and the facility representative within 24 hours of the child’s arrival or by the end of the next business day after the child’s arrival.

History.

2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 815.

Cross references.

As to legal capacity of a parent who is less than 18 years of age to execute a valid entrustment agreement, including and agreement providing for termination of parental rights, see §

63.2-903

B.

As to parental consent to adoption, see also §

63.2-1202

.

As to placement of children for adoption by agency or local board, see §

63.2-1221

. As to jurisdiction of juvenile and domestic relations district courts, see § 16.1-241. As to approval of entrustment agreements, see § 16.1-277.01.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 815 added the last sentence in the first paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 63.2-1818.
Reports to Commissioner.

Upon the entry of a final order of adoption involving a child placed by a licensed child-placing agency, that agency shall transmit to the Commissioner all reports and collateral information in connection with the case which shall be preserved by the Commissioner in accordance with §

63.2-1246

. Such agency may keep duplicate copies of such reports and collateral information or may obtain copies of such documents from the Commissioner at a reasonable fee as prescribed by the Board.

History.

2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1819.
Where child-placing agencies may place children.

Any licensed child-placing agency may place or negotiate and arrange for the placement of children in any licensed children’s residential facility, and, unless its license contains a limitation to the contrary, a licensed child-placing agency may also place or arrange for the placement of such persons in any suitable foster home or independent living arrangement.

History.

2002, c. 747; 2008, cc. 475, 483.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are identical, and substituted “independent living arrangement” for “independent living placement” at the end of the section.